trunk/apertium-swe-dan/dev/saldo/saldo.nouns.dix
<pardef n="w__n_nt">
  <e>       <p><l>w</l>         <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>:s</l>        <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>-s</l>        <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>-et</l>       <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>-t</l>        <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>:et</l>       <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>:t</l>        <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>:n</l>        <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>-n</l>        <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>-na</l>       <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>:na</l>       <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="slogan__n_ut">
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>en</l>        <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>s</l>         <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>s</l>         <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>sen</l>       <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="papyr/us__n_ut">
  <e>       <p><l>us</l>        <r>us<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>us</l>        <r>us<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>en</l>        <r>us<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>usen</l>      <r>us<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>er</l>        <r>us<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>erna</l>      <r>us<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="hum/mer__n_ut">
  <e>       <p><l>mer</l>       <r>mer<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>mern</l>      <r>mer<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>rar</l>       <r>mer<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>mrar</l>      <r>mer<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>rarna</l>     <r>mer<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>mrarna</l>    <r>mer<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="te__n_nt">
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>t</l>         <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>et</l>        <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>er</l>        <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>erna</l>      <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="ord/en__n_ut">
  <e>       <p><l>en</l>        <r>en<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>nen</l>       <r>en<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>nar</l>       <r>en<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>narna</l>     <r>en<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="sol/o__n_nt">
  <e>       <p><l>o</l>         <r>o<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ot</l>        <r>o<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>on</l>        <r>o<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>i</l>         <r>o<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ona</l>       <r>o<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="vy__n_ut">
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>n</l>         <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>er</l>        <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>erna</l>      <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="stimul/us__n_v">
  <e>       <p><l>us</l>        <r>us<s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>uset</l>      <r>us<s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>us</l>        <r>us<s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>us</l>        <r>us<s n="n"/><s n="sp"/><s n="ind"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>i</l>         <r>us<s n="n"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>us</l>        <r>us<s n="n"/><s n="sp"/><s n="ind"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>usen</l>      <r>us<s n="n"/><s n="sp"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ina</l>       <r>us<s n="n"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="domini/on__n_nt">
  <e>       <p><l>on</l>        <r>on<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>on</l>        <r>on<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>er</l>        <r>on<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>erna</l>      <r>on<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="mix/er__n_ut">
  <e>       <p><l>ern</l>       <r>er<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>er</l>        <r>er<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sp"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>rar</l>       <r>er<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ers</l>       <r>er<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>erna</l>      <r>er<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>rarna</l>     <r>er<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ersarna</l>   <r>er<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
</pardef>

<e lm="shaker">          <i>shak</i><par n="mix/er__n_ut"/></e>
<e lm="sitter">          <i>sitt</i><par n="mix/er__n_ut"/></e>
<e lm="semitrailer">     <i>semitrail</i><par n="mix/er__n_ut"/></e>
<e lm="w">               <i>w</i><par n="w__n_nt"/></e>
<e lm="tanker">          <i>tank</i><par n="mix/er__n_ut"/></e>
<e lm="skanner">         <i>skann</i><par n="mix/er__n_ut"/></e>
<e lm="slogan">          <i>slogan</i><par n="slogan__n_ut"/></e>
<e lm="babysitter">      <i>babysitt</i><par n="mix/er__n_ut"/></e>
<e lm="scanner">         <i>scann</i><par n="mix/er__n_ut"/></e>
<e lm="trailer">         <i>trail</i><par n="mix/er__n_ut"/></e>
<e lm="schlager">        <i>schlag</i><par n="mix/er__n_ut"/></e>
<e lm="mixer">           <i>mix</i><par n="mix/er__n_ut"/></e>
<e lm="oljetanker">      <i>oljetank</i><par n="mix/er__n_ut"/></e>
<e lm="stimulus">        <i>stimul</i><par n="stimul/us__n_v"/></e>
<e lm="solo">            <i>sol</i><par n="sol/o__n_nt"/></e>
<e lm="supertanker">     <i>supertank</i><par n="mix/er__n_ut"/></e>
<e lm="separator">       <i>separator</i><par n="vy__n_ut"/></e>
<e lm="kommunistparti">  <i>kommunistparti</i><par n="te__n_nt"/></e>
<e lm="negligé">         <i>negligé</i><par n="vy__n_ut"/></e>
<e lm="musteri">         <i>musteri</i><par n="te__n_nt"/></e>
<e lm="limkokeri">       <i>limkokeri</i><par n="te__n_nt"/></e>
<e lm="marknivå">        <i>marknivå</i><par n="vy__n_ut"/></e>
<e lm="kvacksalveri">    <i>kvacksalveri</i><par n="te__n_nt"/></e>
<e lm="propå">           <i>propå</i><par n="vy__n_ut"/></e>
<e lm="spondé">          <i>spondé</i><par n="vy__n_ut"/></e>
<e lm="persongalleri">   <i>persongalleri</i><par n="te__n_nt"/></e>
<e lm="tavelgalleri">    <i>tavelgalleri</i><par n="te__n_nt"/></e>
<e lm="kuli">            <i>kuli</i><par n="vy__n_ut"/></e>
<e lm="spaljé">          <i>spaljé</i><par n="vy__n_ut"/></e>
<e lm="lingeri">         <i>lingeri</i><par n="te__n_nt"/></e>
<e lm="konstgalleri">    <i>konstgalleri</i><par n="te__n_nt"/></e>
<e lm="staty">           <i>staty</i><par n="vy__n_ut"/></e>
<e lm="dominion">        <i>domini</i><par n="domini/on__n_nt"/></e>
<e lm="knutbroderi">     <i>knutbroderi</i><par n="te__n_nt"/></e>
<e lm="restaurator">     <i>restaurator</i><par n="vy__n_ut"/></e>
<e lm="koppleri">        <i>koppleri</i><par n="te__n_nt"/></e>
<e lm="zulu">            <i>zulu</i><par n="vy__n_ut"/></e>
<e lm="stolleri">        <i>stolleri</i><par n="te__n_nt"/></e>
<e lm="cloqué">          <i>cloqué</i><par n="vy__n_ut"/></e>
<e lm="taskspeleri">     <i>taskspeleri</i><par n="te__n_nt"/></e>
<e lm="vulkanisator">    <i>vulkanisator</i><par n="vy__n_ut"/></e>
<e lm="kavalleri">       <i>kavalleri</i><par n="te__n_nt"/></e>
<e lm="papyrus">         <i>papyr</i><par n="papyr/us__n_ut"/></e>
<e lm="ventilator">      <i>ventilator</i><par n="vy__n_ut"/></e>
<e lm="slädparti">       <i>slädparti</i><par n="te__n_nt"/></e>
<e lm="spermatozo">      <i>spermatozo</i><par n="vy__n_ut"/></e>
<e lm="häxeri">          <i>häxeri</i><par n="te__n_nt"/></e>
<e lm="kliché">          <i>kliché</i><par n="vy__n_ut"/></e>
<e lm="dominikanerorden"><i>dominikanerord</i><par n="ord/en__n_ut"/></e>
<e lm="riddarorden">     <i>riddarord</i><par n="ord/en__n_ut"/></e>
<e lm="snuskhummer">     <i>snuskhum</i><par n="hum/mer__n_ut"/></e>
<e lm="summer">          <i>sum</i><par n="hum/mer__n_ut"/></e>
<e lm="vasaorden">       <i>vasaord</i><par n="ord/en__n_ut"/></e>
<e lm="orden">           <i>ord</i><par n="ord/en__n_ut"/></e>
<e lm="strumpebandsorden"><i>strumpebandsord</i><par n="ord/en__n_ut"/></e>
<e lm="malteserorden">   <i>malteserord</i><par n="ord/en__n_ut"/></e>
<e lm="backhammer">      <i>backham</i><par n="hum/mer__n_ut"/></e>
<e lm="benediktinerorden"><i>benediktinerord</i><par n="ord/en__n_ut"/></e>
<e lm="skolfröken">      <i>skolfrök</i><par n="ord/en__n_ut"/></e>
<e lm="frimurarorden">   <i>frimurarord</i><par n="ord/en__n_ut"/></e>
<e lm="hummer">          <i>hum</i><par n="hum/mer__n_ut"/></e>
<e lm="tiggarorden">     <i>tiggarord</i><par n="ord/en__n_ut"/></e>
<e lm="jesuitorden">     <i>jesuitord</i><par n="ord/en__n_ut"/></e>
<e lm="munkorden">       <i>munkord</i><par n="ord/en__n_ut"/></e>
<e lm="braxen">          <i>brax</i><par n="ord/en__n_ut"/></e>
<e lm="karmelitorden">   <i>karmelitord</i><par n="ord/en__n_ut"/></e>
<e lm="kartusianorden">  <i>kartusianord</i><par n="ord/en__n_ut"/></e>
